Mississippi, session 2026, HB824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-41-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-41-1.  (1)  The State Board of Education is authorized, empowered and directed to promulgate rules and regulations relating to the transportation of students enrolled in the public school districts, including rules and regulations for: (a)  Setting standards for public school district bus routes; (b)  Setting standards for public school district buses; (c)  Setting standards for public school district bus drivers; (d)  Formulating procedure for selecting public school district bus drivers; (e)  Formulating courses of training for public school district bus drivers and mechanics, and assist in administering and financing such courses; (f)  Providing operation procedure for public school district buses to insure safety of pupils; (g)  Formulating specifications for use in purchasing public school district buses; getting bids on public school district buses; equipment and supplies; and fixing prices based upon said bids which school districts may not exceed in purchasing said equipment; (h)  Formulating specifications for use by school districts in purchasing used school buses; and (i)  Providing a system of records and reports for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of Sections 37-41-1 through 37-41-51, and providing the superintendent of schools with a sufficient supply of report forms. All rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Board of Education relating to school district bus drivers shall also be applicable to drivers of privately owned buses transporting public school district children. All rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Board of Education pursuant to the authority conferred by this section shall be spread at large upon the minutes of the State Board of Education and copies thereof shall be furnished to all school boards not less than thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of such rules and regulations. Except for subsection (2) of this section, the provisions of this chapter are applicable to school districts and the transportation of students enrolled in public school districts.  Charter schools authorized by the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board are exempt from the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The driver of every school transportation vehicle used to transport pupils must be trained and certified in first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).  The State Board of Education and Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board shall enforce this subsection. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.